Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1622
Judgments against public corporations; duty of corporate authorities to make levy.

The corporate officers whose duty it is to levy and collect taxes for the payment of the current expenses of any such corporation, against which a judgment may be so obtained, shall also be required to levy and collect the special tax herein provided for, for the payment of judgments.

Laws 1867 (Ter.), § 4, p. 13;

R.S.1913, § 6467;

C.S.1922, § 5990;

C.S.1929, § 77-1812;

R.S.1943, § 77-1622.

Mandamus will not lie to compel school officers to report amount of taxes necessary to pay judgment, while dormant. State of Nebraska ex rel. Craig v. School Dist. No. 2 of Phelps County, 25 Neb. 301, 41 N.W. 155 (1888).

Municipality is required to levy tax to pay judgment for cost of utility plants in excess of bond issue. Village of Oshkosh v. State, 20 F.2d 621 (8th Cir. 1927).